Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
D. Derivative Proceedings

§ 17-16-740.
Subarticle definitions.

As used in this subarticle:

“Derivative proceeding” means a civil suit in the right of a domestic corporation or, to the extent provided in W.S.

17-16-747

, in the right of a foreign corporation;

“Shareholder” includes a beneficial owner whose shares are held in a voting trust or held by a nominee on the beneficial owner’s behalf.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3.

Cross references. —

As to general rules of pleading, see Rule 8, W.R.C.P. As to derivative actions by shareholders, see Rule 23.1, W.R.C.P.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-741.
Standing.

A shareholder may not commence or maintain a derivative proceeding unless the shareholder:

Was a shareholder of the corporation at the time of the act or omission complained of, or became a shareholder through transfer by operation of law from one who was a shareholder at the time; and

Fairly and adequately represents the interests of the corporation in enforcing the right of the corporation.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Plenary jurisdiction in case involving irregularities in trustee's intervention. —

When irregularities were alleged regarding a trustee's intervention in certain litigation, the district court was not deprived of jurisdiction to enter orders after the intervention; the jurisdiction of the district courts is defined by art. 5, § 10, Wyo. Const., and it has plenary jurisdiction over trust administration, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

4-10-203

. Woods v. Wells Fargo Bank, 2004 WY 61, 90 P.3d 724,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. June 22, 2004).

Investors' interests not so antagonistic as to render them inadequate derivative representatives. —

Fact that the investors had offered to buy the company's outstanding shares and several of its assets in the past did not amount to an antagonistic economic interest and did not render them inadequate derivative representatives under Fed. R. Civ. P. 23.1 or Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

17-16-741

. Ravenswood Inv. Co., L.P. v. Bishop Capital Corp., 374 F. Supp. 2d 1055, 2005 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12932 (D. Wyo. 2005).

Shareholders had standing to bring shareholder derivative suit. —

Trial court had subject matter jurisdiction over a shareholder derivative suit against the officers and directors of a Wyoming corporation since the shareholders (SH) had standing under this section and Fed. R. Civ. P. 23.1 as they alleged they were shareholders of the corporation, were shareholders at the time of the wrongdoing alleged, and had been shareholders continuously since that time. Schmitz v. Xiqing Diao, 2013 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 160685 (D. Wyo. Nov. 7, 2013).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of independent accountant to investors or shareholders, 48 ALR5th 389.

§ 17-16-742.
Demand.

No shareholder may commence a derivative proceeding until:

A written demand has been made upon the corporation to take suitable action; and

Ninety (90) days have expired from the date the demand was made unless the shareholder has earlier been notified that the demand has been rejected by the corporation or unless irreparable injury to the corporation would result by waiting for the expiration of the ninety (90) day period.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-16-743.
Stay of proceedings.

If the corporation commences an inquiry into the allegations made in the demand or complaint, the court may stay any derivative proceeding for such period as the court deems appropriate.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 17-16-744.
Dismissal.

A derivative proceeding shall be dismissed by the court on motion by the corporation if one (1) of the groups specified in subsection (b) or (e) of this section has determined in good faith after conducting a reasonable inquiry upon which its conclusions are based that the maintenance of the derivative proceeding is not in the best interests of the corporation.

Unless a panel is appointed pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, the determination in subsection (a) of this section shall be made by:

A majority vote of qualified directors present at a meeting of the board of directors if the qualified directors constitute a quorum; or

A majority vote of a committee consisting of two (2) or more qualified directors appointed by majority vote of qualified directors present at a meeting of the board of directors, regardless of whether such qualified directors constitute a quorum.

If a derivative proceeding is commenced after a determination has been made rejecting a demand by a shareholder, the complaint shall allege with particularity facts establishing either:

That a majority of the board of directors did not consist of qualified directors at the time the determination was made; or

That the requirements of subsection (a) of this section have not been met.

If a majority of the board of directors consisted of qualified directors at the time the determination was made, the plaintiff shall have the burden of proving that the requirements of subsection (a) of this section have not been met; if not, the corporation shall have the burden of proving that the requirements of subsection (a) of this section have been met.

Upon motion by the corporation or any interested party, the court may appoint a panel of one (1) or more individuals to make a determination whether the maintenance of the derivative proceeding is in the best interests of the corporation. In such case, the plaintiff shall have the burden of proving that the requirements of subsection (a) of this section have not been met.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 190, § 1; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “one (1) of the groups specified in subsection (b) or (e)” for “the panel specified in subsection (b)” in (a); rewrote (b) to change the composition of the decision-making group; and added (c) through (e).

§ 17-16-745.
Discontinuance or settlement.

A derivative proceeding may not be discontinued or settled without the court’s approval. If the court determines that a proposed discontinuance or settlement will substantially affect the interests of the corporation’s shareholders or a class of shareholders, the court shall direct that notice be given to the shareholders affected.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 17-16-746.
Payment of expenses.

On termination of the derivative proceeding the court may:

Order the corporation to pay the plaintiff’s reasonable expenses, including counsel fees, incurred in the proceeding if it finds that the proceeding resulted in a substantial benefit to the corporation;

Order the plaintiff to pay any defendant’s reasonable expenses, including counsel fees, incurred in defending the proceeding if it finds that the proceeding was commenced or maintained without reasonable cause or for an improper purpose; or

Order a party to pay an opposing party’s reasonable expenses, including counsel fees, incurred because of the filing of a pleading, motion or other paper, if it finds that the pleading, motion or other paper was not well grounded in fact, after reasonable inquiry, or warranted by existing law or a good faith argument for the extension, modification or reversal of existing law and was interposed for an improper purpose, such as to harass or to cause unnecessary delay or needless increase in the cost of litigation.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-16-747.
Applicability to foreign corporations.

In any derivative proceeding in the right of a foreign corporation, the matters covered by this subarticle shall be governed by the laws of the jurisdiction of incorporation of the foreign corporation except for W.S.

17-16-743

,

17-16-745

and

17-16-746

.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 190, § 1.